District of Columbia statutes.
7-1306.01

Repealed

Increased financial responsibility.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 601, 25 DCR 5094
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 506(y), 42 DCR 3684
1981 Ed., § 6-1981.
1973 Ed., § 6-1695.
Temporary Repeal of Section For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 4(i) of Human Services Spending Reduction Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-29, July 25, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 4002).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 4(i) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-35, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1834), § 4(i) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-104, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4014), and § 506(y) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).